Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.10.180

Elected official. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

"Elected official" means any person elected at a general or special election to any public office, and any person appointed to fill a vacancy in any such office.

[ 2024 c 164 s 218.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.